Tennessee, session 114, SB0687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-104(i), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) By June 1, 2025, and June 1 each year thereafter, the commissioner shall
publish on the department's website the number of waivers granted to LEAs pursuant to
this subsection (i) during the previous school year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0687
000970
- 1 -